Utah statutes.
76-10-107.   Abuse of psychotoxic chemical solvents.
(1)  A person is guilty of abuse of psychotoxic chemical solvents if:
(a)  for the purpose of causing a condition of intoxication, inebriation,
excitement, stupefaction, or the dulling of his brain or nervous system, he
intentionally:
(i)  smells or inhales the fumes of any psychotoxic chemical solvent; or
(ii)  possesses, purchases, or attempts to possess or purchase any psychotoxic
chemical solvent; or
(b) the person offers, sells, or provides a psychotoxic chemical solvent to
another person, knowing that other person or a third party intends to possess
or use that psychotoxic chemical solvent in violation of Subsection (1)(a).
(2)  This section does not apply to the prescribed use, distribution, or sale
of those substances for medical or dental purposes.
(3)  Abuse of psychotoxic chemical solvents is a class B misdemeanor.
(4)  As used in this section, psychotoxic chemical solvent includes any glue,
cement, or other substance containing one or more of the following chemical
compounds: acetone and acetate, amyl nitrite or amyl nitrate or their isomers,
benzene, butyl alcohol, butyl nitrite, butyl nitrate, or their isomers, ethyl
alcohol, ethyl nitrite or ethyl nitrate, ethylene dichloride, isobutyl
alcohol, methyl alcohol, methyl ethyl ketone, n-propyl alcohol,
pentachlorophenol, petroleum ether, propyl nitrite or propyl nitrate or their
isomers, toluene or xylene, or other chemical substance capable of causing a
condition of intoxication, inebriation, excitement, stupefaction, or the
dulling of the brain or nervous system as a result of the inhalation of the
fumes or vapors of such chemical substance.  Nothing in this section shall be
construed to include any controlled substance regulated by the provisions of
Title 58, Chapter 37, Utah Controlled Substances Act.
